Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.502

Financial aid counseling curriculum for institutions with Washington college grant recipients—Financial education workshops.

(1) The office must provide a financial aid counseling curriculum to institutions of higher education with Washington college grant recipients. The curriculum must be available via a website. The curriculum must include, but not be limited to:

(a) An explanation of the Washington college grant program rules, including maintaining satisfactory progress, repayment rules, and usage limits;

(b) Information on campus and private scholarships and work-study opportunities, including the application processes;

(c) An overview of student loan options with an emphasis on the repayment obligations a student borrower assumes regardless of program completion, including the likely consequences of default and sample monthly repayment amounts based on a range of student levels of indebtedness;

(d) An overview of personal finance, including basic money management skills such as living within a budget and handling credit and debt;

(e) Average salaries for a wide range of jobs;

(f) Financial education that meets the needs of, and includes perspectives from, a diverse group of students who are or were recipients of financial aid, including student loans, who may be trained by the financial education public-private partnership; and

(g) Contact information for local financial aid resources and the federal student aid ombuds' office.

(2) By the 2013-14 academic year, the institution of higher education must take reasonable steps to ensure that each Washington college grant recipient receives information outlined in subsection (1)(a) through (g) of this section by directly referencing or linking to the website on the conditions of award statement provided to each recipient.

(3) By July 1, 2013, the office must disseminate the curriculum to all institutions of higher education participating in the Washington college grant program. The institutions of higher education may require students who are not participating in the Washington college grant program to participate in all or portions of the financial aid counseling.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by the 2017-18 academic year, each institution of higher education must take reasonable steps to ensure that the institution presents, and each incoming student participates in, a financial education workshop. The scope of the workshop must include, but is not limited to, the information outlined in subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this section, and include recommendations by the financial education public-private partnership. The institutions are encouraged to present these workshops during student orientation or as early as possible in the academic year.

[ 2019 c 406 s 37; 2017 c 177 s 1; 2013 c 23 s 59; 2012 c 31 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.